Massachusetts, session 194th, S386.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by striking out section 38Q and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 38Q. Every school district in the commonwealth shall adopt and implement a
professional development plan for all principals, teachers, other professional staff,
paraprofessionals and teacher assistants employed by the district, to include the professional
support teams established pursuant to section thirty-eight G, and annually shall update such plans
and set forth a budget for professional development within the confines of the foundation budget.
Said plan shall include training in the teaching of new curriculum frameworks and other related
pedagogical skills required for the effective implementation of this act, including creating
equitable, inclusive school and classroom climates, using participatory decision making,
of 2

delivering framework content to students in racially, linguistically, and culturally responsive
ways, and seeking parent and community involvement. The plan shall also include training in:
(1) analyzing and integrating diverse learning styles of all students in order to achieve an
objective of inclusion in the regular classroom of students with diverse individual and cultural
learning styles; and (2) methods of collaboration among teachers, paraprofessionals and teacher
assistants to integrate such styles. The plan may also include training in the provision of pre-
referral services within regular education. Said plan shall also include training for members of
school councils, pursuant to section fifty-nine C. Said plan shall include teacher training which
addresses the effects of gender and racial and cultural bias toward Black, Indigenous, and People
of Color in the classroom, as well as training on implicit bias. In any school district with English
learners as defined in chapter 71A, the plan shall provide training for teachers in second
language acquisition techniques for the re-certification of teachers and administrators. All
professional development plans required by this section shall be filed annually with the
commissioner of education.
The commissioner of education for the commonwealth shall prepare each year a plan for
providing statewide assistance in the preparation and implementation of professional
development plans. The plan shall include data that demonstrates, statewide and by school
district, the types of professional development provided for educators who work with English
learners as defined in chapter 71A. The commissioner shall consult with the board of higher
education in developing said plan. This plan shall evaluate the feasibility of obtaining assistance
from institutions of higher education and private service providers. The plan shall be submitted
to the board of education for approval. A copy of said plan shall be submitted to the joint
committee on education, arts, and humanities of the general court.
of 2